Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 62
COLORADO UNIFORM LIMITED
PARTNERSHIP ACT OF 1981

Cross references:

For application of general partnership law to limited partnerships, see § 7-60-106; for applicability and short title of this article, see §§ 7-62-1101 and 7-62-1105; for the "Uniform Records Retention Act", see article 17 of title 6.

Law reviews:

For article, "FLPs for Family Asset Management and Transfer Tax Planning", see 24

C

olo. Law. 1245 (1995); for article, "

C

olorado Choice of Entity 1998", see 27 Colo. Law. 5 (June 1998); for article, "Colorado Choice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2001 Update", see 30 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2001); for article "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2004 Update", see 34 Colo. Law. 11 (Jan. 2005).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED PARTNERSHIP

PART 3 LIMITED PARTNERS

PART 4 GENERAL PARTNERS

PART 5 FINANCE

PART 6 DISTRIBUTIONS AND WITHDRAWAL

PART 7 ASSIGNMENT OF PARTNERSHIP INTERESTS

PART 8 DISSOLUTION

PART 9 FOREIGN LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS

PART 10 DERIVATIVE ACTIONS

PART 11 MISCELLANEOUS

PART 12 FEES